Florida, session 2026, SB636.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 161.101, 27 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 28 161.101âState and local participation in authorized 29 projects and studies relating to beach management and erosion 30 control.â 31 (1)(a)âThe Legislature recognizes that beach erosion is a 32 statewide problem that does not confine its effects to local 33 governmental jurisdictions and that beach erosion can be 34 adequately addressed most efficiently by a state-initiated 35 program of beach restoration and beach nourishment. However, 36 since local beach communities derive the primary benefits from 37 the presence of adequate beaches, a program of beach restoration 38 and beach nourishment should not be accomplished without a 39 commitment of local funds to combat the problem of beach 40 erosion. 41 (b)âAccordingly, the Legislature declares that the state, 42 through the department, shall determine those beaches which are 43 critically eroded and in need of restoration and nourishment and 44 may authorize appropriations to pay up to 75 percent of the 45 actual costs for restoring and nourishing a critically eroded 46 beach. The local government in which such a beach is located is 47 responsible for the balance of such costs. In designating 48 beaches as critically eroded, the department shall review data 49 related to beaches that have been preemptively and repeatedly 50 repaired to avoid complete erosion and for which private 51 funding, local government funding, and state and federal grants 52 have been expended to stop or mitigate such erosion. 53 (c)âIf a local government with jurisdiction over a beach 54 that possesses all of the following features has a financial 55 plan that ensures the preservation of funding for inclusion in 56 the state strategic beach management plan, such beach must be 57 designated as critically eroded: 58 1.âA perpetual easement that contains language stating that 59 the local government with jurisdiction over the beach must 60 assume maintenance responsibilities for shoreline parcels and 61 must develop and implement a design whereby shoreline retreat is 62 sufficiently managed to protect high value inland developments; 63 and 64 2.âGeological features of the dune, beach, and seabed 65 combined with insufficient spacing between the erosion control 66 line to upland assets, which results in repeated inland flooding 67 or structural damage The local government in which the beach is 68 located shall be responsible for the balance of such costs. 69 (2)(a)âTo carry out the beach and shore preservation 70 programs, the department is hereby constituted as the beach and 71 shore preservation authority for the state. In this capacity, 72 the secretary of the department may at his or her own initiative 73 take all necessary steps as soon as practicable and desirable to 74 implement the provisions of this chapter. 75 (b)âThe secretary of the department may, as he or she deems 76 necessary, require coastal local governments to develop local 77 strategic beach management plans. Local strategic beach 78 management plans must include, but are not limited to, an 79 identification of the most visited shoreline recreational 80 facilities, university research centers, and shoreline 81 protection areas and an analysis of all of the following: 82 1.âCompound flooding near the countyâs beaches. 83 2.âAssessed values of upland properties and developments. 84 3.âEnvironmentally sensitive lands and waters. 85 4.âAny recommendation from a certified coastal engineer or 86 coastal engineering specialist. 87 5.âAny recommendation from the United States Army Corps of 88 Engineers. 89 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 90 161.161, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 91 161.161âProcedure for approval of projects.â 92 (2)âThe comprehensive long-term management plan developed 93 and maintained by the department pursuant to subsection (1) must 94 include, at a minimum, a strategic beach management plan, a 95 critically eroded beaches report, and a statewide long-range 96 budget plan. The long-range budget plan must include a 3-year 97 work plan for beach restoration, beach nourishment, and inlet 98 management projects that lists planned projects for each of the 99 3 fiscal years addressed in the work plan. 100 (a)âThe strategic beach management plan must identify and 101 recommend appropriate measures for all of the stateâs critically 102 eroded sandy beaches and may incorporate plans prepared at the 103 regional level, including plans developed pursuant to s. 104 161.101(2)(b), taking into account areas of greatest need and 105 probable federal and local funding. Upon approval in accordance 106 with this section, such regional plans, along with the 3-year 107 work plan identified in subparagraph (c)1., must serve as the 108 basis for state funding decisions. Before finalizing the 109 strategic beach management plan, the department shall hold a 110 public meeting in the region for which the plan is prepared or 111 hold a publicly noticed webinar. 112 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 113 380.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 114 380.05âAreas of critical state concern.â 115 (2)âAn area of critical state concern may be designated 116 only for: 117 (a)âAn area containing, or having a significant impact 118 upon, environmental or natural resources of regional or 119 statewide importance, including, but not limited to, state or 120 federal parks;, forests;, wildlife refuges;, wilderness areas;, 121 aquatic preserves;, major rivers and estuaries;, state 122 environmentally endangered lands;, Outstanding Florida Waters;, 123 low elevation sections immediately inland of the dune and beach 124 which have been repeatedly breached or overtopped by seawater 125 flowing into an interconnected stormwater system or which have 126 been designated in a local emergency declaration for a prolonged 127 period; and aquifer recharge areas, the uncontrolled private or 128 public development of which would cause substantial 129 deterioration of such resources. Specific criteria which must 130 shall be considered in designating an area under this paragraph 131 include: 132 1.âWhether the economic value of the area, as determined by 133 the type, variety, distribution, relative scarcity, and 134 condition of the environmental or natural resources within the 135 area, is of substantial regional or statewide importance. 136 2.âWhether the ecological value of the area, as determined 137 by the physical and biological components of the environmental 138 system, is of substantial regional or statewide importance. 139 3.âWhether the area is a designated critical habitat of any 140 state or federally designated threatened or endangered plant or 141 animal species. 142 4.âWhether the area is inherently susceptible to 143 substantial development due to its geographic location or 144 natural aesthetics. 145 5.âWhether any existing or planned substantial development 146 within the area will directly, significantly, and deleteriously 147 affect any or all of the environmental or natural resources of 148 the area which are of regional or statewide importance. 149 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 150 made by this act to section 380.05, Florida Statutes, in 151 references thereto, subsections (1), (3), and (5) of section 152 380.045, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 153 380.045âResource planning and management committees; 154 objectives; procedures.â 155 (1)âPrior to recommending an area as an area of critical 156 state concern pursuant to s. 380.05, the Governor, acting as the 157 chief planning officer of the state, shall appoint a resource 158 planning and management committee for the area under study by 159 the state land planning agency. The objective of the committee 160 shall be to organize a voluntary, cooperative resource planning 161 and management program to resolve existing, and prevent future, 162 problems which may endanger those resources, facilities, and 163 areas described in s. 380.05(2) within the area under study by 164 the state land planning agency. 165 (3)âNot later than 12 months after its appointment by the 166 Governor, the committee shall either adopt a proposed voluntary 167 resource planning and management program for the area under 168 study or recommend that a voluntary resource planning and 169 management program not be adopted. The proposed voluntary 170 resource planning and management program shall contain the 171 committee findings with respect to problems that endanger those 172 resources, facilities, and areas described in s. 380.05(2) and 173 shall contain detailed recommendations for state, regional, and 174 local governmental actions necessary to resolve current and 175 prevent future problems identified by the committee. A major 176 objective of the proposed voluntary resource planning and 177 management program shall be the effective coordination of state, 178 regional, and local planning; program implementation; and 179 regulatory activities for comprehensive resource management. The 180 committee shall submit the proposed voluntary resource planning 181 and management program to the head of the state land planning 182 agency, who shall transmit the program along with the 183 recommendations of the agency for monitoring and enforcing the 184 program, as well as any other recommendations deemed 185 appropriate, to the Administration Commission. 186 (5)âThe state land planning agency shall report to the 187 Administration Commission within 12 months of the approval of 188 the program by the commission concerning the implementation and 189 the effects of the approved voluntary resource planning and 190 management program. The report shall include, but shall not be 191 limited to: 192 (a)âAn assessment of state agency compliance with the 193 program, including the degree to which the program 194 recommendations have been integrated into agency planning, 195 program implementation, regulatory activities, and rules; 196 (b)âAn assessment of the compliance by each affected local 197 government with the program; 198 (c)âAn evaluation of state, regional, and local monitoring 199 and enforcement activities and recommendations for improving 200 such activities; and 201 (d)âA recommendation as to whether or not all or any 202 portion of the study area should be designated an area of 203 critical state concern pursuant to s. 380.05. 204 205 The state land planning agency may make such other reports to 206 the commission as it deems necessary, including recommending 207 that all or any portion of the study area be designated an area 208 of critical state concern because of special circumstances in 209 the study area or in the implementation of the approved 210 voluntary resource planning and management program. 211 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.